src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
!! Noun inflection for Võro
! ------------------------
!LEXICON NUM_ !!= * @CODE@ Lacks specific continuation lexicon
!+Num+WORK: #;

LEXICON NUM-SG_NOM_
+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON NUM_SADA_SG_OBL
+Sg+Ela:st#saast K ;
+Sg+Gen:#saa K ;
+Sg+Ter:#saani K ;

LEXICON NUM_TWIST_OBL
+Sg+Ela:st#tõist#kümnest K ;
+Sg+Gen:#tõist#kümne K ;
+Sg+Ter:#tõist#kümneni K ;

!LEXICON NUM_1HANS1A !!= @CODE@ 1 hanśa:hanśa
!        NUM_1HANS1A-SG ;
!        NUM_1HANS1A_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_1HANS1A-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_1HANS1A-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_1HANS1A_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_1HANS1A_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu
!	N_1VIU-SG ;
!	N_1VIU_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_1VIU-SG
!:%{back%}	NMN_1VIU-SG ; 
!LEXICON NUM_1VIU_PL
!:%{back%}	NMN_1VIU_PL ; 


!LEXICON NUM_1HERRAE !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
!	N_1HERRAE-SG ;
!	N_1HERRAE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_1HERRAE-SG
!:	NMN_1HERRAE-SG ; 
!LEXICON NUM_1HERRAE_PL
!:	NMN_1HERRAE_PL ; 

!LEXICON NUM_1PREI !!= @CODE@ 1 prei:prei
!	N_1PREI-SG ;
!	N_1PREI_PL ;!

!LEXICON NUM_1PREI-SG
!:	NMN_1PREI-SG ; 
!LEXICON NUM_1PREI_PL
!:	NMN_1PREI_PL ; 

!LEXICON NUM_2ARTIKLI
!! * Yaml: **suhvli**
!   NUM_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
!   NUM_2ARTIKLI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_2ARTIKLI-SG
!:%{back%}	NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_2ARTIKLI_PL
!:%{back%}	NMN_2ARTIKLI_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_2KERGE
!! * Yaml: **kerge**
!   NUM_2KERGE-SG ;
!   NUM_2KERGE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_2KERGE-SG
!:	NMN_2KERGE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_2KERGE_PL
!:	NMN_2KERGE_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_3PERAEDUE !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!! * Yaml: **peraedue**
!   NUM_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
!   NUM_3PERAEDUE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_3PERAEDUE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_3PERAEDUE_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_3PERAEDUE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!! * Yaml: **peraedue**
!   NUM_3ALADU-SG ;
!   NUM_3ALADU_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_3ALADU-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_3ALADU_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_4TERVUES
!! * Yaml: **tervues**
!   NUM_4TERVUES-SG ;
!   NUM_4TERVUES_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_4TERVUES-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVUES-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_4TERVUES_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVUES_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_4AINUS
!! * Yaml: **A-ainus**
!   NUM_4AINUS-SG ;
!   NUM_4AINUS_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_4AINUS-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_4AINUS_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS_PL ;


LEXICON NUM_5OPPAJA
!! * Yaml: **N-oppaja5**
   NUM_5OPPAJA-SG ;
   NUM_5OPPAJA_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_5OPPAJA-SG
:%{back%}	NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_5OPPAJA_PL
:%{back%}	NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_5MAENGJAE
!! * Yaml: **N-mängjä5**
   NUM_5MAENGJAE-SG ;
   NUM_5MAENGJAE_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_5MAENGJAE-SG
:	NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-SG ;
