src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
katõssa+Num:katõssa NUM_5OPPAJA  "" ;
ütessä+Num:ütessä NUM_5MAENGJAE  "" ;
kolm+v2+Num:kolq NUM-SG_NOM_  "" ;
